North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120. General Assembly.
Article 7D. Codification of Statutes.

§ 120-36.21.
Codification of Statutes.

The Legislative Services Officer shall assign to staff of the General Assembly the following duties:

To supervise the recodification of all the statute law of North Carolina and supervise the keeping of such recodifications current by including therein all laws hereafter enacted by supplements thereto issued periodically, all of which recodifications and supplements shall be appropriately annotated.

In order that the laws of North Carolina, as set out in the General Statutes of North Carolina, may be made and kept as simple, as clear, as concise and as complete as possible, and in order that the amount of construction and interpretation of the statutes required of the courts may be reduced to a minimum, to establish and maintain a system of continuous statute research and correction. To that end the staff shall:

Make a systematic study of the general statutes of the State, as set out in the General Statutes and as hereafter enacted by the General Assembly, for the purpose of ascertaining what ambiguities, conflicts, duplications and other imperfections of form and expression exist therein and how these defects may be corrected.

Consider such suggestions as may be submitted with respect to the existence of such defects and the proper correction thereof.

Prepare for submission to the General Assembly from time to time bills to correct such defects in the statutes as its research discloses.

History.

1939, c. 315, s. 5; 1941, c. 35; 1943, c. 382; 2011-97, s. 1.

§ 120-36.22.
Revisor of Statutes.

The member of the staff of the General Assembly who is assigned to perform the duties prescribed by

G.S. 120-36.21(2)

shall be known as the Revisor of Statutes.

History.

1947, c. 114, s. 1; 1957, c. 541, s. 10; 1967, c. 260, s. 2; 2011-97, s. 1.